Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-230
Street improvement program; tax levy limitation.

Any levy pursuant to section 17-229 shall not be considered within the limitation on the village for the levy of taxes as contained in section 17-702.

Laws 1963, c. 85, § 2, p. 293;

Laws 1965, c. 69, § 2, p. 290;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 47;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 93.